Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3520
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-3520 to 44-3526 shall be known and may be cited as the Motor Vehicle Service Contract Reimbursement Insurance Act.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 92.